Utah statutes.
62A-14-104.   Director of the office -- Appointment -- Qualifications.
(1)  The director of the office shall be appointed by the executive director.
(2)  The director shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited university
or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable in matters
concerning guardianship and conservatorship.
(3)  The director is the administrative head of the office.
